Hawaii statutes.
§92-2.5 Permitted interactions of members.
(a) Two members of a board may discuss between themselves matters relating to
official board business to enable them to perform their
duties faithfully, as long as no commitment to vote is made or sought and the
two members do not constitute a quorum of their board.

(b) Two or more members of a board, but less
than the number of members which would constitute a quorum for the board, may
be assigned to:

(1) Investigate a matter relating to the official
business of their board; provided that:

(A) The scope of the investigation and the
scope of each member's authority are defined at a meeting of the board;

(B) All resulting findings and
recommendations are presented to the board at a meeting of the board; and

(C) Deliberation and decisionmaking on the
matter investigated, if any, occurs only at a duly noticed meeting of the board
held subsequent to the meeting at which the findings and recommendations of the
investigation were presented to the board; or

(2) Present, discuss, or negotiate any position which
the board has adopted at a meeting of the board; provided that the assignment
is made and the scope of each member's authority is defined at a meeting of the
board prior to the presentation, discussion, or negotiation.

(c) Discussions between two or more members of
a board, but less than the number of members which would constitute a quorum
for the board, concerning the selection of the board's officers may be
conducted in private without limitation or subsequent reporting.

(d) Board members present at a meeting that
must be canceled for lack of quorum or terminated pursuant to section 92-3.5(c)
may nonetheless receive testimony and presentations on items on the agenda and
question the testifiers or presenters; provided that:

(1) Deliberation or decisionmaking on any item, for
which testimony or presentations are received, occurs only at a duly noticed
meeting of the board held subsequent to the meeting at which the testimony and
presentations were received;

(2) The members present shall create a record of the
oral testimony or presentations in the same manner as would be required by
section 92-9 for testimony or presentations heard during a meeting of the
board; and

(3) Before its deliberation or decisionmaking at a
subsequent meeting, the board shall:

(A) Provide copies of the testimony and
presentations received at the canceled meeting to all members of the board; and

(B) Receive a report by the members who were
present at the canceled or terminated meeting about the testimony and
presentations received.

(e) Two or more members of a board, but less
than the number of members which would constitute a quorum for the board, may
attend an informational meeting or presentation on matters relating to official
board business, including a meeting of another entity, legislative hearing,
convention, seminar, or community meeting; provided that the meeting or
presentation is not specifically and exclusively organized for or directed
toward members of the board. The board members in attendance may participate
in discussions, including discussions among themselves; provided that the
discussions occur during and as part of the informational meeting or
presentation; and provided further that no commitment relating to a vote on the
matter is made or sought.

At the next duly noticed meeting of the board,
the board members shall report their attendance and the matters presented and
discussed that related to official board business at the informational meeting
or presentation.

(f) Discussions between the governor and one
or more members of a board may be conducted in private without limitation or
subsequent reporting; provided that the discussion does not relate to a matter
over which a board is exercising its adjudicatory function.

(g) Discussions between two or more members of
a board and the head of a department to which the board is administratively
assigned may be conducted in private without limitation; provided that the
discussion is limited to matters specified in section 26-35.

(h) Communications, interactions,
discussions, investigations, and presentations described in this section are
not meetings for purposes of this part. [L 1996, c 267, §2; am L 2005, c 84, §1;
am L 2012, c 177, §1]

Law Journals and Reviews

Hawai`i's Sunshine Law Compliance Criteria. 26 UH L. Rev.
21.

Case Notes

Even assuming that written memoranda circulated by council
members, in which the council members presented proposed actions, included
justifications for the proposals, and sought "favorable
consideration" of the proposals constituted a permitted interaction under
subsection (a), the memoranda violated the mandate under subsection (b) that no
permitted interaction be used to circumvent the spirit or requirements of the
sunshine law to make a decision or to deliberate toward a decision upon board
business. The "express premise" of the sunshine law is that opening
up the government process to public scrutiny is the only viable and reasonable
way to protect the public. 130 H. 228, 307 P.3d 1174 (2013).

Written memoranda circulated by council members, in which the
council members presented proposed actions, included justifications for the
proposals, and sought "favorable consideration" of the proposals did
not fall within the permitted interaction described in subsection (a) because
the memoranda: (1) were distributed among all of the members of the Maui
county council rather than among only two members of the board; and (2) sought
a commitment to vote by asking for "favorable consideration" of the
proposals contained within them and thus, violated the sunshine law. 130 H.
228, 307 P.3d 1174 (2013).

Although subsection (a) does not expressly preclude city
counsel members from engaging in serial one-on-one conversations, when council
members engaged in a series of one-on-one conversations relating to a
particular item of council business, under §92-5(b), the spirit of the open
meeting requirement was circumvented and the strong policy of having public
bodies deliberate and decide its business in view of the public was thwarted
and frustrated. 117 H. 1 (App.), 175 P.3d 111.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next